src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NMN_AIHAM
! gradation: yes
!! !!2. WORDS WITH TWO-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 288)
!! !!2.1 Sg.Loc in -ast. a-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!2.1.3 Sg.Ill in palatalization and -a
!! !!2.1.3.3 Has Gradation in last syllable
!! !!2.1.3.3.1 Monophthong
!! !!2.1.3.3.1.3 Consonant always short
!! !!2.1.3.3.1.3.4 Sg.Nom Short vowel AND Short consonant
!! !!2.1.3.3.1.3.4.1.Sg.Gen Weak Grade
!! !!2.1.3.3.1.3.4.1.3 Sg.Ill extra Strong Grade
!! ** Yaml: __N-aiham__
 ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;			! aiham
: SG-NOM ;	    			! aiham
:%^V2VV SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;		! aihaam
:%{XC%}%^C2CC%>a SG-ILL ;      		! aihamma
:%^V2VV%>a SG-LOC ;    			! aihaamast
:%^V2VV SG-COM_IN ;			! aihaamin
:%^V2VV%>a ESS/PAR ;  			! aihaaman
:%^V2VV PL-OBL ;


!! !!CLASS 2 NOMINALS with high stem vowel and i-stems
LEXICON N_JUURD !!= * @CODE@ juurd:jurdd
+N: NMN_JUURD ;
LEXICON NMN_JUURD !!= * @CODE@ juurd:jurdd
! gradation: yes
!! is for nouns with stem ''i'' + ''-est'' +Sg+Loc; all stem other than the +Sg+Nom are X3; the ''i'' does not occur in +Par 
!! N_GEN2I-ILLAX3-LOCEX3-NOM1X1
!! ** Yaml: __N-juurd__
!! * There are several stem types 
!! * juurd:juurd
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY SG-NOM ;
:%>i SG-ACC/GEN ;
:%>ǥ%>a SG-ABE_tta ;
+Use/NG:%>i SG-ABE ;
:%>ǥ%>a SG-ILL ;
+Use/NG:%>j%>a SG-ILL ;
:%>j%>e SG-LOC ;
:%>j SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;
:%>i PL-NOM ;
:%>j%>e ESS/PAR ;
+Use/NG:%>e PAR ;
+N+Der/Dimin:%>j N_KUÂLAŽ ;
+N+Der/Dimin:%>ǥ N_KUÂLAŽ ;

LEXICON N_KOOĐ !!= * @CODE@ koođ:k%^1VOWođđ
+N: NMN_KOOĐ ;
LEXICON NMN_KOOĐ !!= * @CODE@ koođ:k%^1VOWođđ
! gradation: yes
!! is for nouns with stem ''i'' + ''-est'' +Sg+Loc; all stem other than the +Sg+Nom are X3; the ''i'' does not occur in +Par 
!!
!! ** Yaml: __N-koodh__
!! * There are several stem types 
:%^V2VV%^CC2C ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
:%^V2VV%^CC2C SG-NOM ;
:%>i SG-ACC/GEN ;
:%>ǥ%>a SG-ABE_tta ;
+Use/NG:%>i SG-ABE ;
:%>ǥ%>a SG-ILL ;
+Use/NG:%>j%>a SG-ILL ;
:%>j%>e SG-LOC ;
:%>j SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;
:%>i PL-NOM ;
:%>j%>â ESS/PAR ;
+N+Der/Dimin:%>ǥ N_KUÂLAŽ ;
+Use/NG+N+Der/Dimin:%>j N_KUÂLAŽ ;

LEXICON N_KAAV !!= * @CODE@ kaav:kaapp
+N: NMN_KAAV ;
LEXICON NMN_KAAV !!= * @CODE@ kaav:kaapp
! gradation: yes
!! is for nouns with stem ''i'' + ''-est'' +Sg+Loc; all stem other than the +Sg+Nom are X3; the ''i'' does not occur in +Par 
!!
!! ** Yaml: __N-kaav__
!! * There are several stem types 
:%^CC2C ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
:%^CC2C SG-NOM ;
:%>i SG-ACC/GEN ;
:%>ǥ%>a SG-ABE_tta ;
+Use/NG:%>i SG-ABE ;
:%>ǥ%>a SG-ILL ;
+Use/NG:%>j%>a SG-ILL ;
:%>j%>e SG-LOC ;
:%>j SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;
:%>i PL-NOM ;
:%^CC2C%>â ESS/PAR ; !!= * @CODE@ kaavân
:%>j%>â ESS/PAR ; !!= * @CODE@ kaappjân 
+N+Der/Dimin:%>ǥ N_KUÂLAŽ ;
+Use/NG+N+Der/Dimin:%>j N_KUÂLAŽ ;

LEXICON N_POOUS !!= * @CODE@ poous:pohss
+N: NMN_POOUS ;
LEXICON NMN_POOUS !!= * @CODE@ poous:pohss
! gradation: yes
!! is for nouns with stem ''i'' + ''-est'' +Sg+Loc; all stem other than the +Sg+Nom are X3; the ''i'' does not occur in +Par 
!! N_GEN2I-ILLAX3-LOCEX3-NOM1X1
!! ** Yaml: __N-poous__
!! * There are several stem types 
!! * poous:poous
:%^V2VV%^XYY2VY ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
:%^V2VV%^XYY2VY SG-NOM ;
:%>i SG-ACC/GEN ;
:%>ǥ%>a SG-ABE_tta ;
+Use/NG:%>i SG-ABE ;
:%>ǥ%>a SG-ILL ;
+Use/NG:%>j%>a SG-ILL ;
:%>j%>e SG-LOC ;
:%>j SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;
:%>i PL-NOM ;
:%>j%>e ESS/PAR ;
+Use/NG:%>e PAR ;
+N+Der/Dimin:%>j N_KUÂLAŽ ;
+N+Der/Dimin:%>ǥ N_KUÂLAŽ ;

LEXICON N_MAADD !!= * @CODE@ maadd:madd
+N: NMN_MAADD ;
LEXICON NMN_MAADD !!= * @CODE@ maadd:madd
! gradation: yes
!     VV2V
!! is for nouns with stem ''i'' + ''-est'' +Sg+Loc; all stem other than the +Sg+Nom are X3; the ''i'' does not occur in +Par 
!! ** Yaml: __N-maadd__
!! * There are several stem types 
!! * maadd:maadd
!! strong_geminate, long_vowel, no-palatalization, high_stem_vowel
:%^V2VV ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
:%^V2VV SG-NOM ;
!! strong_geminate, short_vowel, no-palatalization, high_stem_vowel
:%>i SG-ACC/GEN ;	 ! maddi
:%>ǥ%>a SG-ABE_tta ;
+Use/NG:%>i SG-ABE ;	 ! maddi
:%>ǥ%>a SG-ILL ;
+Use/NG:%>j%>a SG-ILL ;
:%>j%>e SG-LOC ;
:%>j SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;
:%>i PL-NOM ;	 ! maddi
:%>j%>e ESS/PAR ;
+Use/NG:%>e PAR ;

+Der/Dimin:%>j N_KUÂLAŽ ;
+Der/Dimin:%>ǥ N_KUÂLAŽ ;

LEXICON N_LIÕV !!= * @CODE@ liõv:liõpp
+N: NMN_LIÕV ;
LEXICON NMN_LIÕV
! gradation: yes
! high_vowel: yes
!! * Yaml: __N-liov__
:%^CC2C ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
:%^CC2C SG-NOM ;
:%>i SG-ACC/GEN ;	! liõppi
:%>ǥ%>a SG-ABE_tta ;
+Use/NG:%>i SG-ABE ;	! liõppi
:%>ǥ%>a SG-ILL ;
+Use/NG:%>j%>a SG-ILL ;
:%>j%>e SG-LOC ;
:%>j SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;
:%>i PL-NOM ;	! liõppi
:%>j%>e ESS/PAR ;
+Use/NG:%>e PAR ;
+Der/Dimin:%>j N_KUÂLAŽ ;
+Der/Dimin:%>ǥ N_KUÂLAŽ ;

LEXICON N_MUÕTT !!= * @CODE@ muõtt:muõtˈt
+N: NMN_MUÕTT ;
LEXICON NMN_MUÕTT
! gradation: no
! Gradation: nothing orthographic
!! is for nouns with stem ''i'' + ''-est'' +Sg+Loc; all stem other than the +Sg+Nom are X3; the ''i'' does not occur in +Par 
!! ** Yaml: __N-muott__
!! * There are several stem types 
!! * muõtt:muõtt
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
: SG-NOM ;
:%>i SG-ACC/GEN ;	! muõtti
:%>ǥ%>a SG-ABE_tta ;
+Use/NG:%>i SG-ABE ;	! muõtti
:%>ǥ%>a SG-ILL ;
+Use/NG:%>j%>a SG-ILL ;
:%>j%>e SG-LOC ;
:%>j SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;
:%>i PL-NOM ;	! muõtti
:%>j%>e ESS/PAR ;
+Use/NG:%>e PAR ;
+Der/Dimin:%>j N_KUÂLAŽ ;
+Der/Dimin:%>ǥ N_KUÂLAŽ ;

LEXICON N_SUÕL !!= * @CODE@ suõl:suõlˈl
+N: NMN_SUÕL ;
LEXICON NMN_SUÕL
! gradation: no
! Gradation: nothing orthographic
!! is for nouns with stem ''i'' + ''-est'' +Sg+Loc; all stem other than the +Sg+Nom are X3; the ''i'' does not occur in +Par 
!! ** Yaml: __N-suol__
!! * There are several stem types 
:%^CCC2C ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
:%^CCC2C SG-NOM ;
:%>i SG-ACC/GEN ;	! suõlˈli
:%>ǥ%>a SG-ABE_tta ;
+Use/NG:%>i SG-ABE ;	! suõlˈli
:%>ǥ%>a SG-ILL ;
+Use/NG:%>j%>a SG-ILL ;
:%>j%>e SG-LOC ;
:%>j SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;
:%>i PL-NOM ;	! suõlˈli
:%>j%>e ESS/PAR ;
!:%>e PAR ; 2015-10-06
+Der/Dimin:%>j N_KUÂLAŽ ;
+Der/Dimin:%>ǥ N_KUÂLAŽ ;

LEXICON N_PUÅĐ !!= * @CODE@ puåđ:puått
+N: NMN_PUÅĐ ;
LEXICON NMN_PUÅĐ
! gradation: no
! Gradation: nothing orthographic
!! is for nouns with stem ''i'' + ''-est'' +Sg+Loc; all stem other than the +Sg+Nom are X3; the ''i'' does not occur in +Par 
!! ** Yaml: __N-puadh__
!! * There are several stem types 
:%^CC2C ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
:%^CC2C SG-NOM ;
:%>i SG-ACC/GEN ;	! puåtti
:%>ǥ%>a SG-ABE_tta ;
+Use/NG:%>i SG-ABE ;	! puåtti
:%>ǥ%>a SG-ILL ;
+Use/NG:%>j%>a SG-ILL ;
:%>j%>e SG-LOC ;
:%>j SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;
:%>i PL-NOM ;	! puåtti
:%>j%>e ESS/PAR ;
+Use/NG:%>e PAR ;
+Der/Dimin:%>j N_KUÂLAŽ ;
+Der/Dimin:%>ǥ N_KUÂLAŽ ;

LEXICON N_MUÅRD !!= * @CODE@ muård:muårdd
+N: NMN_MUÅRD ;
LEXICON NMN_MUÅRD
! gradation: yes
! high_vowel: yes
!! ** Yaml: __N-muard__
:%^XYY2XY ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
:%^XYY2XY SG-NOM ;
:%>i SG-ACC/GEN ;	! muårddi
:%>ǥ%>a SG-ABE_tta ;
+Use/NG:%>i SG-ABE ;	! muårddi
:%>ǥ%>a SG-ILL ;
+Use/NG:%>j%>a SG-ILL ;
:%>j%>e SG-LOC ;
:%>j SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;
:%>i PL-NOM ;	! muårddi
:%>j%>e ESS/PAR ;
+Use/NG:%>e PAR ;
+Der/Dimin:%>j N_KUÂLAŽ ;
+Der/Dimin:%>ǥ N_KUÂLAŽ ;

LEXICON N_MUUƷ !!= * @CODE@ muuʒ:muvʒʒ
+N: NMN_MUUƷ ;
