src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N-INCOMING
aain:a%^1VOWinn N_JUURD ;
aaud:a%^1VOWudd N_JUURD ;
arggvuõdd:argg#vuõdˈd N_MUÕTT ;
caarkaav:caar#kaa%^1VOWpp N_KAAV ;
ceälkalmkõõrv:ceälkalm#kõ%^1VOWrvv N_JUURD ;
ekonomiitiõđ:ekonomii#tiõtt N_LIÕV ;
heäʹrvv-vuõdd:heäʹrvv-#vuõdˈd N_MUÕTT ;
jaam:ja%^1VOWmm N_KAAV ;
jeeʹlezčooud:jeeʹlez#čo%^1VOWudd N_JUURD ;
jânnamtiõđ:jânnam#tiõtt N_LIÕV ;
jaam:ja%^1VOWmm N_KAAV ;
jõnnpiâr:jõnn#piârˈr N_SUÕL ;
jõõdd:jõ%^1VOWdd N_MAADD ;
kaalm:ka%^1VOWlmm N_JUURD ;
kaammipoous:kaammi#po%^1VOWhss N_POOUS ;
kaard:ka%^1VOWrdd N_JUURD ;
kauppsuõl:kaupp#suõlˈl N_SUÕL ;
konjuŋtiaciâlk:konjuŋtia#ciâlkk N_MUÅRD ;
korggpuåđ:korgg#puått N_PUÅĐ ;
kueʹllšiil:kueʹll#ši%^1VOWll N_KAAV ;
kuõn:kuõnˈn N_SUÕL ;
kuõr:kuõrˈr N_SUÕL ;
kuõst:kuõstt N_MUÅRD ;
käiʹddnjuõl:käiʹdd#njuõlˈl N_SUÕL ;
käiʹddnjuõl:käiʹdd#njuõlˈl N_SUÕL ;
kårmmansuõl:kårmman#suõlˈl N_SUÕL ;
kõõskâsmiõst:kõõskâs#miõstt N_MUÅRD ;
kõõččâmciâlk:kõõččâm#ciâlkk N_MUÅRD ;
laainâsmaadd:laainâs#ma%^1VOWdd N_MAADD ;
laauǥ:la%^1VOWugg N_JUURD ;
looun:lo%^1VOWunn N_JUURD ;
loođvuõdd:loođ#vuõdˈd N_MUÕTT ;
lääʹppviõtt:lääʹpp#viõtˈt N_MUÕTT ;
låʹddčoodd:låʹdd#čo%^1VOWdd N_MAADD ;
lõsttmaadd:lõstt#ma%^1VOWdd N_MAADD ;
meerlaaul:mẹẹr#la%^1VOWull N_JUURD ;
meersažlaaul:mẹẹrsaž#la%^1VOWull N_JUURD ;
meertiõđ:mẹẹr#tiõtt N_LIÕV ;
miârrsaaiv:miârr#sa%^1VOWivv N_JUURD ;
miõlljuurd:miõll#ju%^1VOWrdd N_JUURD ;
morddsuõl:mordd#suõlˈl N_SUÕL ;
mueʹrjjmiõst:mueʹrjj#miõstt N_MUÅRD ;
muuʒ:muvʒʒ N_MUUƷ ;
muård:muårdd N_MUÅRD ;
mââʹnemlaašt:mââʹnem#la%^1VOWštt N_JUURD ;
mäddtäällpuåđ:mädd#tääll#puått N_PUÅĐ ;
neeuʹresšõŋŋnjuõl:neeuʹresšõŋŋ#njuõlˈl N_SUÕL ;
njeʹšǩǩmaadd:njeʹšǩǩ#ma%^1VOWdd N_MAADD ;
njuåđ:njuåđđ N_PUÅĐ ;
njuõckkčoodd:njuõckk#čo%^1VOWdd N_MAADD ;
njuõl:njuõlˈl N_SUÕL ;
nuâkkamlaaul:nuâkkam#la%^1VOWull N_JUURD ;
nuäkkamlaaul:nuäkkam#la%^1VOWull N_JUURD ;
ouddjuurd:oudd#ju%^1VOWrdd N_JUURD ;
ođđkaav:ođđkaa%^1VOWpp N_KAAV ;
ođđmuõtt:ođđ#muõtˈt N_MUÕTT ;
paain:pa%^1VOWinn N_JUURD ;
peiʹvvpaašt:peiʹvv#pa%^1VOWštt N_JUURD ;
peiʹvvpoous:peiʹvv#po%^1VOWhss N_POOUS ;
peäʹlǧǧmaadd:peäʹlǧǧ#ma%^1VOWdd N_MAADD ;
pieʹccmaadd:pieʹcc#ma%^1VOWdd N_MAADD ;
pirrõstäältiõđ:pirrõstääl#tiõtt N_LIÕV ;
poous:po%^1VOWhss N_POOUS ;
poʒʒmaadd:poʒʒ#ma%^1VOWdd N_MAADD ;
puäjmiõst:puäj#miõstt N_MUÅRD ;
puästjuurd:puäst#ju%^1VOWrdd N_JUURD ;
puäʒʒsuõl:puäʒʒ#suõlˈl N_SUÕL ;
pâʹjjsõõusvaatt:pâʹjj#sõõus#va%^1VOWtt N_MAADD ;
päʹrnnpiâr:päʹrnn#piârˈr N_SUÕL ;
põrggâmpuåđ:põrggâm#puått N_PUÅĐ ;
reddpaain:redd#pa%^1VOWinn N_JUURD ;
rekordšiil:rekord#ši%^1VOWll N_KAAV ;
relativciâlk:relativ#ciâlkk N_MUÅRD ;
reznkakoođ:reznkako%^1VOWđđ N_KAAV ;
reznkoođ:reznko%^1VOWđđ N_KAAV ;
reʹssmiõst:reʹss#miõstt N_MUÅRD ;
ruõđ:ruõtt N_PUÅĐ ;
rääʹhhlaapp:rääʹhh#la%^1VOWpp N_MAADD ;
rääʹssjânnamtiõđ:rääʹssjânnam#tiõtt N_LIÕV ;
rääʹsstiõđ:rääʹss#tiõtt N_LIÕV ;
rõõdd:rõ%^1VOWdd N_MAADD ;
saalv:sa%^1VOWlvv N_JUURD ;
seivvâmrõõdd:seivvâm#rõ%^1VOWdd N_MAADD ;
seäʹlǧǧnjuõl:seäʹlǧǧ#njuõlˈl N_SUÕL ;
seäʹlǧǧnjuõl:seäʹlǧǧ#njuõlˈl N_SUÕL ;
seäʹlǧǧruõđ:seäʹlǧǧ#ruõtt N_PUÅĐ ;
staaul:sta%^1VOWull N_JUURD ;
suâpččvuõdd:suâpčč#vuõdˈd N_MUÕTT ;
suâŋasmuõtt:suâŋas#muõtˈt N_MUÕTT ;
suåpčvuõdd:suåpčvuõdˈd N_MUÕTT ;
suõvvnjõõdd:suõvv#njõ%^1VOWdd N_MAADD ;
suʹmeâdmuõtt:suʹmeâd#muõtˈt N_MUÕTT ;
sääʹmpiâr:sääʹm#piârˈr N_SUÕL ;
taail:ta%^1VOWill N_JUURD ;
taalkâstiõđ:taalkâs#tiõtt N_LIÕV ;
takaijuurd:takai#ju%^1VOWrdd N_JUURD ;
teäggtemjuurd:teäggtem#ju%^1VOWrdd N_JUURD ;
tiân:tiânˈn N_SUÕL ;
tiõđ:tiõtt N_LIÕV ;
tuâjjǩiõld:tuâjj#ǩiõldd N_MUÅRD ;
tuåimmjemjuurd:tuåimmjem#ju%^1VOWrdd N_JUURD ;
tuõiv:tuõivv N_MUÅRD ;
tuʹššjuurd:tuʹšš#ju%^1VOWrdd N_JUURD ;
täältiõđ:tääl#tiõtt N_LIÕV ;
uurd:u%^1VOWrdd N_JUURD ;
vaard:va%^1VOWrdd N_JUURD ;
vieʹrmmjaam:vieʹrmm#ja%^1VOWmm N_KAAV ;
viõtt:viõtˈt N_MUÕTT ;
vueiʹvvciâlk:vueiʹvv#ciâlkk N_MUÅRD ;
vueiʹvvpuåđ:vueiʹvvpuått N_PUÅĐ ;
vuejjamǩiõld:vuejjam#ǩiõldd N_MUÅRD ;
vueʹlljuurd:vueʹll#ju%^1VOWrdd N_JUURD ;
vueʹsttjuurd:vueʹstt#ju%^1VOWrdd N_JUURD ;
vuâđđlaašt:vuâđđ#la%^1VOWštt N_JUURD ;
vuâđđlaašt:vuâđđ#la%^1VOWštt N_JUURD ;
vuõptmaadd:vuõpt#ma%^1VOWdd N_MAADD ;
väimmjuurd:väimm#ju%^1VOWrdd N_JUURD ;
väinnjuurd:väinn#ju%^1VOWrdd N_JUURD ;
väʹlddciâlk:väʹldd#ciâlkk N_MUÅRD ;
ämmatpuåđ:ämmat#puått N_PUÅĐ ;
ålgganliikkeemǩiõld:ålggan#liikkeem#ǩiõldd N_MUÅRD ;
åålǥasmetteemǩiõld:åålǥas#metteem#ǩiõldd N_MUÅRD ;
ååʹrehmiõst:ååʹreh#miõstt N_MUÅRD ;
čiõrstõõllâmrõõdd:čiõrstõõllâm#rõ%^1VOWdd N_MAADD ;
čoott:čo%^1VOWtt N_MAADD ;
čooud:čo%^1VOWudd N_JUURD ;
čääʹʒʒnjõõdd:čääʹʒʒ#njõ%^1VOWdd N_MAADD ;
čårrciâlk:čårr#ciâlkk N_MUÅRD ;
čårrpuåđ:čårr#puått N_PUÅĐ ;
čåuʹjjlaašt:čåuʹjj#la%^1VOWštt N_JUURD ;
šâddtiõđ:šâdd#tiõtt N_LIÕV ;
ǩeisarkaav:ǩeisarkaa%^1VOWpp N_KAAV ;
ǩeʹrjjvuõdd:ǩeʹrjj#vuõdˈd N_MUÕTT ;
ǩiârd:ǩiârdd N_MUÅRD ;
ǩiõld:ǩiõldd N_MUÅRD ;
ǩiõll-laauǥ:ǩiõll-#la%^1VOWugg N_JUURD ;
ǩiõlltiõđ:ǩiõll#tiõtt N_LIÕV ;
ǩiõttmaadd:ǩiõtt#ma%^1VOWdd N_MAADD ;
